Illinois, session 104th, HB5072.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Sustainable Investing Act is 5amended by changing Sections 5 and 10 and by adding Sections 625, 30, and 35 as follows: 7    (30 ILCS 238/5)8    Sec. 5. Findings and purpose. 9    (a) The General Assembly finds that consideration of 10factors relevant to the environmental impact, social impact, 11and governance of investments is vital for maximizing the 12safety and performance of public funds. Such sustainability 13factors are indicative of the overall performance of an 14investment and are strong indicators of its long-term value. 15Public agencies and governments have a duty to recognize and 16evaluate these materially relevant factors. 17    (b) It is the purpose of this Act to prudently integrate 18sustainability factors into the investment decision-making, 19investment analysis, portfolio construction, due diligence, 20and investment ownership of public funds to maximize 21anticipated financial returns, minimize projected risks, more 22effectively execute fiduciary duties, and contribute to a more 23just, accountable, and sustainable State of Illinois.   HB5072- 2 -LRB104 18517 HLH 31959 b1    (c) The General Assembly reaffirms its prior findings that 2factors relevant to the environmental impact, social impact, 3and governance of investments are indicative of the overall 4performance of an investment and that agencies and governments 5have a duty to recognize and evaluate these materially 6relevant factors. 7    (d) The General Assembly finds that other states have 8taken actions that may impede the ability of Illinois persons 9to take actions under sustainable investment policies 10consistent with the principles of this Act. 11    (e) It is the intent of the State of Illinois to foster an 12environment where not only agencies and governments but 13private entities can prudently consider materially-relevant 14environmental, social, and governance factors in their 15investment decision-making, investment analysis, portfolio 16construction, due diligence, and investment ownership 17activities. 18    (g) It is the purpose of this Act to make it clear that 19State resources should not be used to advance efforts by any 20individual or government to impede Illinois persons' lawful 21sustainable investment activity as described in this Act and 22to provide recourse for Illinois persons who may be subject to 23such actions. 24(Source: P.A. 101-473, eff. 1-1-20.) 25    (30 ILCS 238/10)  HB5072- 3 -LRB104 18517 HLH 31959 b1    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 2    "Company proposal" means a proposal made by a company's 3shareholder that is included in the company's proxy statement, 4including the nomination of a director. 5    "Financial institution" means a bank, savings bank, or 6credit union established under the laws of the State of 7Illinois, another state, or the United States of America.8    "Governmental unit" has the same meaning as in the Local 9Government Debt Reform Act. 10    "Investment manager" means a fiduciary who: 11        (1) is a fiduciary selected by a public agency, 12    pension fund, retirement system, or governmental unit who 13    has the power to manage, acquire, or dispose of any asset 14    of a public agency, pension fund, retirement system or 15    governmental unit;16        (2) has acknowledged in writing that he or she is a 17    fiduciary with respect to the public fund, retirement 18    system, or pension fund; and19        (3) is at least one of the following: (i) registered 20    as an investment adviser under the federal Investment 21    Advisers Act of 1940; (ii) registered as an investment 22    adviser under the Illinois Securities Law of 1953; (iii) a 23    bank, as defined in the Investment Advisers Act of 1940; 24    or (iv) an insurance company authorized to transact 25    business in this State. 26    "Investment policy" means a written investment policy   HB5072- 4 -LRB104 18517 HLH 31959 b1adopted by a public agency or governmental unit which 2addresses safety of principal, liquidity of funds, and return 3on investment and which requires the investment portfolio be 4structured in such a manner as to provide sufficient liquidity 5to pay obligations as they come due. 6    "Lawful sustainable investment activity" means: 7        (1) any activity that is not unlawful under the laws 8    of this State or under the laws of the United States taken 9    to carry out a sustainable investment policy as described 10    in this Act, regardless of whether the sustainable 11    investment policy was adopted by a public agency, 12    governmental unit, or any other entity doing business in 13    Illinois; 14        (2) any action taken in furtherance of providing the 15    following services that is not unlawful under the laws of 16    this State or the United States: 17            (A) advice or recommendations on how to vote on a 18        proxy proposal or company proposal; 19            (B) proxy statement research and analysis 20        regarding a proxy proposal or company proposal; 21            (C) rating or research regarding corporate 22        governance; or 23            (D) the development of proxy voting 24        recommendations or policies, including establishing 25        default recommendations or policies. 26    "Proxy proposal" means a proposal made by a company's   HB5072- 5 -LRB104 18517 HLH 31959 b1shareholder that is included in the company's proxy statement, 2including the nomination of a director. 3    "Public agency" means the State of Illinois, the various 4counties, townships, cities, towns, villages, school 5districts, educational service regions, special road 6districts, public water supply districts, fire protection 7districts, drainage districts, levee districts, sewer 8districts, housing authorities, the Illinois Bank Examiners' 9Education Foundation, the Chicago Park District, and all other 10political corporations or subdivisions of the State of 11Illinois, now or hereafter created, whether herein 12specifically mentioned or not. 13    "Public funds" means current operating funds, special 14funds, interest and sinking funds, and funds of any kind or 15character belonging to or in the custody of any public agency. 16    "Sustainability factors" means factors that may have a 17material and relevant financial impact on the safety or 18performance of an investment and which are complementary to 19financial factors and financial accounting. 20(Source: P.A. 103-324, eff. 1-1-24; revised 7-1-25.) 21    (30 ILCS 238/25 new)22    Sec. 25. Conflict of law. Notwithstanding any general or 23special law or common law conflict of law rule to the contrary, 24the laws of this State shall govern in any case or controversy 25heard in this State related to lawful sustainable investment   HB5072- 6 -LRB104 18517 HLH 31959 b1activity. 2    (30 ILCS 238/30 new)3    Sec. 30. Prohibited State actions.4    (a) Unless otherwise necessary to comply with Illinois or 5federal law, the State shall not provide any information to or 6expend or use any time, money, facilities, property, 7equipment, personnel, or other resources to assist any 8individual, or out-of-state officer, official, agency, entity, 9or department seeking to impose civil or criminal liability 10upon a person or entity for lawful sustainable investment 11activity. 12    (b) This Section does not apply if an individual or 13out-of-state officer, official, agency, entity, or department 14is investigating conduct that would be subject to civil or 15criminal liability under the laws of Illinois or the laws of 16the United States.  17    (30 ILCS 238/35 new)18    Sec. 35. Right of action.19    (a) If judgment is entered in any other state against any 20person residing or domiciled in Illinois, and if the judgment 21is based, in whole or in part, on the alleged provision, 22receipt, assistance in receipt or provision, material support 23for, or any theory of vicarious, joint, several, or conspiracy 24liability derived therefrom, for lawful sustainable investment   HB5072- 7 -LRB104 18517 HLH 31959 b1activity that is permitted under the laws of this State, that 2person may recover damages from any party that brought the 3action leading to that judgment or has sought to enforce that 4judgment. 5    (b) Any person aggrieved by conduct in subsection (a) 6shall have a right of action in a State circuit court or as a 7supplemental claim in federal district court against any party 8that brought the action leading to that judgment or has sought 9to enforce that judgment. This lawsuit must be brought not 10later than 2 years after the violation of subsection (a). 11    (c) If the court finds that a violation of subsection (a) 12has occurred, the court may award to the plaintiff: 13        (1) actual damages created by the action that led to 14    that judgment, including, but not limited to, money 15    damages in the amount of the judgment in that other state 16    and costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney's fees, 17    including expert witness fees and other litigation 18    expenses, spent in defending the action that resulted in 19    the entry of the judgment in another state; and 20        (2) costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney's fees, 21    including expert witness fees and other litigation 22    expenses, incurred in bringing an action under this Act as 23    may be allowed by the court. 24    (d) The provisions of this Act shall not apply to a 25judgment entered in another state that is based on: 26        (1) an action founded in contract, and for which a   HB5072- 8 -LRB104 18517 HLH 31959 b1    similar claim would exist under the laws of this State, 2    brought or sought to be enforced by a party with a 3    contractual relationship with the person that is the 4    subject of the judgment entered in another state; or 5        (2) an action where no part of the acts that formed the 6    basis for liability occurred in this State.